North Carolina statutes. Chapter 10B. Notaries.
Part 5. Certificate Forms.

§ 10B-135.
Validity of notarial certificates.

The provisions contained in Article 1, Part 6, of this Chapter, with regard to notarial certificate forms, are applicable for the purposes of this Article.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-136.
Form of evidence of authority of electronic notarial act.

Electronic evidence of the authenticity of the official electronic signature and electronic seal of an electronic notary of this State, if required, shall be attached to, or logically associated with, a notarized electronic document transmitted to another state or nation and shall be in the form of an electronic certificate of authority signed by the Secretary in conformance with any current and pertinent international treaties, agreements, and conventions subscribed to by the government of the United States.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-137.
Certificate of authority for electronic notarial act.

An electronic certificate of authority evidencing the authenticity of the official electronic signature and electronic seal of an electronic notary of this State shall contain substantially the following words:

Click to view

The Secretary may charge ten dollars ($10.00) for issuing an electronic certificate of authority.

Certificate of Authority for an Electronic Notarial Act I, (name, title, jurisdiction of commissioning official) certify that (name of electronic notary), the person named as an electronic notary public in the attached or associated document, was indeed registered as an electronic notary public for the State of North Carolina and authorized to act as such at the time of the document’s electronic notarization. To verify this Certificate of Authority for an Electronic Notarial Act, I have included herewith my electronic signature this day of , 20. (Electronic signature (and seal) of commissioning official)

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§§ 10B-138 through 10B-144.

Reserved for future codification purposes.